North Carolina statutes. Chapter 17D. North Carolina Justice Academy.
§ 17D-1.
Definitions.

As used in this Chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Academy” means the North Carolina Justice Academy.

“Academy property” means property that is owned or leased in whole or in part by the State of North Carolina and which is subject to the general management and control of the Department of Justice and is located in Salemburg, North Carolina, or at any other locations within the State which are dedicated to the use of the North Carolina Justice Academy subsequent to this Chapter being enacted.

“The Commission” means the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission.

“Criminal justice agencies” means the State and local law enforcement agencies, the State and local police traffic service agencies, the State correctional agencies, the jails and other correctional agencies maintained by local governments, the courts of the State and the juvenile justice agencies.

“Criminal justice personnel” means any person who serves or assists any State or local agency engaged in crime prevention, crime reduction, crime investigation, training or educating of persons employed by criminal justice agencies, or enforcement of the criminal law; or any person employed by a criminal justice agency.

“Department” means the Department of Justice.

History.

1973, c. 749; 1977, c. 831, s. 1; 1979, c. 763, s. 2; 1997-456, s. 27.

Editor’s Note.

This Chapter is Chapter 17B as rewritten by Session Laws 1979, c. 763, s. 2, effective January 1, 1980, and recodified. Where appropriate, the historical citations to the sections in the former Chapter have been added to corresponding sections in the Chapter as rewritten and recodified.

Subdivisions (a) to (f) of this section were renumbered as subdivisions (1) to (6) pursuant to Session Laws 1997-456, s. 27 which authorized the Revisor of Statutes to renumber or reletter sections and parts of sections having a number or letter designation that is incompatible with the General Assembly’s computer database.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1982 criminal law, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1060 (1983).

§ 17D-2.
Academy established; duties.

The North Carolina Department of Justice shall establish a North Carolina Justice Academy.

The Department of Justice shall employ the staff of the academy and direct its operations.

Duties of the academy. The North Carolina Justice Academy shall have, but is not limited to, the following functions:

It may provide training programs for criminal justice personnel.

It may provide technical assistance upon request to criminal justice agencies to aid them in the discharge of their responsibilities.

It may develop, publish, and distribute educational and training materials.

It may take such other actions as may be deemed necessary or appropriate to carry out its assigned duties and responsibilities.

History.

1973, c. 749; 1979, c. 763, s. 2.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2007-547, s. 11, provides: “The North Carolina Justice Academy shall establish protocols suitable for the training of State and local law enforcement officers. The protocols shall be made available to all State and local law enforcement agencies so that the agencies may conduct training on:

“(1) The phenomenon of human trafficking and State and federal laws on human trafficking.

“(2) How to recognize and identify victims of one or more of the practices set forth in

G.S. 14-43.11

,

G.S. 14-43.12

, or

G.S. 14-43.13

.

“(3) Methods for protecting trafficking victims and possible trafficking victims, and advising them of their rights.

“(4) Procedures and techniques for handling specialized needs of victims who may face cultural, language, and other barriers that impede ability to request and obtain available services.

“Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the North Carolina Justice Academy to conduct training of State or local law enforcement officers.”

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 18.1, provides: “The North Carolina Justice Academy shall develop and make available to law enforcement officers in this State an online training course on the use of social media. The course shall include methods individual law enforcement officers can take to protect their personal information.”

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2016.’ ”

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 39.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2016-2017 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2016-2017 fiscal year.”

Session Laws 2016-94, s.
39.7, is a severability clause.

§ 17D-3.
Donations.

The Department of Justice may accept for any of its purposes and functions under this Article any and all donations, both real and personal, and grants of money from any governmental unit or public agency, or from any institution, person, firm or corporation. Any arrangements pursuant to this section shall be detailed in an annual report of the academy. Such reports shall include the identity of the donor, the nature of the transaction, and the conditions, if any. Any money received by the Department of Justice pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the account of the academy. All moneys involved shall be subject to audit by the State Auditor.

History.

1979, c. 763, s. 2.

§ 17D-4.
Application of State highway and motor vehicles laws at the academy; authority of Department of Justice to regulate traffic, etc.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, all of the provisions of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes relating to the use of highways of the State and the operation of vehicles thereon are applicable to all streets, alleys, driveways, and parking lots on academy property. Nothing in this section modifies any rights of ownership or control of academy property, now or hereafter vested in the State of North Carolina ex rel., Department of Justice.

The Department of Justice may by ordinance prohibit, regulate, divert, control, and limit pedestrian or vehicular traffic and the parking of vehicles and other modes of conveyance on the campus. In fixing speed limits, the Department of Justice is not subject to

G.S. 20-141(f)

or (g), but may fix any speed limit reasonable and safe under the circumstances as conclusively determined by the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice may not regulate traffic on streets open to the public as of right, except as specifically provided in this section.

The Department of Justice may by ordinance provide for the registration of vehicles maintained or operated on the campus by any student, faculty member, or employee of the academy and may fix fees for such registration. The ordinance may make it unlawful for any person to operate an unregistered vehicle on the campus when the vehicle is required by the ordinance to be registered.

The Department of Justice may by ordinance set aside parking lots on the campus for use by students, faculty, and employees of the academy and members of the general public attending schools, conferences, or meetings at the academy, visiting or making use of any academy facilities, or attending to official business with the academy. The Department of Justice may issue permits to park in these lots and may charge a fee therefor. The Department of Justice may also by ordinance make it unlawful for any person to park a vehicle in any lot or other parking facility without procuring the requisite permit and displaying it on the vehicle.

The Department of Justice may by ordinance provide for the issuance of stickers, decals, permits or other indicia representing the registration of vehicles or the eligibility of vehicles to park on the campus and may by ordinance prohibit the forgery, counterfeiting, unauthorized transfer, or unauthorized use of such stickers, decals, permits or other indicia.

Violation of an ordinance adopted under any portion of this section is a Class 3 misdemeanor. An ordinance may provide that certain acts prohibited thereby shall not be enforced by criminal sanctions, and in such cases a person committing any such act shall not be guilty of a misdemeanor.

An ordinance adopted under this section may provide that a violation will subject the offender to a civil penalty. Penalties may be graduated according to the seriousness of the offense or the number of prior offenses committed by the person charged. The Department of Justice may establish procedure for the collection of these penalties and may enforce the penalties by civil action in the nature of debt. The Department of Justice may also provide for appropriate administrative sanctions if an offender does not pay a validly due penalty or has committed repeated offenses. Appropriate administrative sanctions include, but are not limited to, revocation of parking permits, termination of vehicle registration, and termination or suspension of enrollment in or employment by the academy.

An ordinance adopted under this section may provide that any vehicle illegally parked may be removed to a storage area, in which case the person so removing the vehicle shall be deemed a legal possessor within the meaning of

G.S. 44A-2(d)

.

Evidence that a vehicle was found parked or unattended in violation of a council ordinance is prima facie evidence that the vehicle was parked by:

The person holding an academy parking permit for the vehicle;

If no academy parking permit has been issued for the vehicle, the person in whose name the vehicle is registered with the academy pursuant to subsection (c); or

If no academy parking permit has been issued for the vehicle and the vehicle is not registered with the academy, the person in whose name it is registered with the North Carolina Department of Motor Vehicles or the corresponding agency of another state or nation.

The rule of evidence established by this subsection applies only in civil, criminal, or administrative actions or proceedings concerning violations of ordinances of the Department of Justice.

G.S. 20-162.1

does not apply to such actions or proceedings.

The Department of Justice shall cause to be posted appropriate notice to the public of applicable traffic and parking restrictions.

All ordinances adopted under this section shall be filed in the offices of the North Carolina Attorney General and the Secretary of State. The Department of Justice shall provide for printing and distributing copies of its traffic and parking ordinances.

All moneys received pursuant to this section shall be State funds as defined in

G.S. 143C-1-1

.

History.

1977, c. 831, s. 2; 1979, c. 763, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 309; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2006-203, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 12, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, substituted “G.S. 143C-1-1” for “G.S. 143-1” in subsection (
l
).